South Dakota, session 2026, HB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-22:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no employer, educational institution,
state agency, political subdivision, or other person may require an individual to receive a
COVID-19 vaccination as a condition of employment, enrollment, or for the receipt of a
benefit or service.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.